Nebraska, session 109, LB117.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB117 LB117
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-2704.13, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.13 Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of:
(1) Sales and purchases of electricity, coal, gas, fuel oil, diesel
fuel, tractor fuel, propane, gasoline, coke, nuclear fuel, butane, wood
as fuel, and corn as fuel when more than fifty percent of the amount
purchased is for use directly in irrigation or farming;
(2) Sales and purchases of such energy sources or fuels when more
than fifty percent of the amount purchased is for use directly in
processing, manufacturing, or refining, in the generation of electricity,
in the compression of natural gas for retail sale as a vehicle fuel, or
by any hospital. For purposes of this subdivision, processing includes
the drying and aerating of grain in commercial agricultural facilities;
and
(3) Sales and purchases of utilities including electricity, natural
gas, propane, and sewer for residential use. For purposes of this
subdivision, residential use includes, but is not limited to, (a) use at
a primary residence that is an apartment where the cost of such utilities
is paid as a separate line-item charge from rent and (b) use at a
commercial property where the primary use of the property is as one or
more primary residences; and
(4) (3) Sales and purchases of water used for irrigation of
agricultural lands and manufacturing purposes.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-2704.13, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-